District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.06

Methods of registering to vote.

(a)

To apply to register to vote, a covered voter may use a federal postcard application or the application’s electronic equivalent, or any other method approved under federal law.

(b)

A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot to apply to register to vote if the declaration is received by 30 days before the election.

(c)

The Board shall ensure that the electronic transmission system described in § 1-1061.04(c) is capable of accepting both a federal postcard application and any other approved electronic registration application sent to the Board. The voter may use the electronic transmission system or any other method approved under federal law to register to vote.

History

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 106, 59 DCR 2542

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1061.07.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 6 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.